src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-saemmlazh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Adjective - säʹmmlaž class 19: # Adjective 'Skolt Sami' - full paradigm
#    säʹmmlaž+A+Pred+Sg: säʹmmlaž
#    säʹmmlaž+A+Pred+Pl: säʹmmla
# Are Predicate forms really necessary?
    säʹmmlaž+A+Attr: säʹmmlaž
    säʹmmlaž+A+Comp: säʹmmlab
    säʹmmlaž+A+Superl: säʹmmlumus
    säʹmmlaž+A+Sg+Nom: säʹmmlaž
    säʹmmlaž+A+Sg+Gen: säʹmmla
    säʹmmlaž+A+Sg+Acc: säʹmmla
    säʹmmlaž+A+Sg+Ill: säʹmmliʹžže
    säʹmmlaž+A+Sg+Loc: säʹmmlast
    säʹmmlaž+A+Sg+Com: säʹmmlain
    säʹmmlaž+A+Ess: säʹmmliʹžžen
    säʹmmlaž+A+Par: säʹmmliʹžžed
    säʹmmlaž+A+Sg+Abe: säʹmmlatää
    säʹmmlaž+A+Pl+Nom: säʹmmla
    säʹmmlaž+A+Pl+Gen: säʹmmlai
    säʹmmlaž+A+Pl+Acc: säʹmmlaid
    säʹmmlaž+A+Pl+Ill: säʹmmlaid
    säʹmmlaž+A+Pl+Loc: säʹmmlain
    säʹmmlaž+A+Pl+Com: säʹmmlaivuiʹm
    säʹmmlaž+A+Pl+Abe: säʹmmlaitää
